Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.060

Benefit. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.

[ 2024 c 164 s 206.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.